Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Nonprofit carshare organization. new text end new text begin (a) Sales, except under paragraph (b), to a nonprofit carshare organization are exempt if the items purchased are used in providing carshare services. For purposes of this subdivision, "nonprofit carshare organization" means a nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to provide carshare services and that is exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (b) This exemption does not apply to sales of prepared food; candy; soft drinks; alcoholic beverages as defined in section 297A.67, subdivision 2; and taxable cannabis products as defined in section 295.81, subdivision 1, paragraph (r). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2026. new text end